Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Operation, Management and Personnel

§ 47-5-1.
Policy of state in operation and management of correctional system; independent internal examinations.

It shall be the policy of this state, in the operation and management of the correctional system, to so manage and conduct the same in that manner as will be consistent with the operation of a modern correctional system and with the view of making the system self-sustaining. Those convicted of violating the law and sentenced to a term in the state correctional system shall have humane treatment, and be given opportunity, encouragement and training in the manner of reformation.

It shall be the policy of this state that the correctional system shall be operated and managed in the most efficient and economical manner possible. The Mississippi Department of Corrections shall so manage and operate the correctional system in that manner in order to make the system self-sustaining and to conserve state general fund revenues. The Mississippi Department of Corrections shall provide leadership to bring about the earliest possible construction of satisfactory prison inmate facilities, and shall utilize existing state resources, including inmates for prison construction labor, when and wherever practicable, in order to minimize the need for state general funds for prison construction.

It shall be the policy of this state that periodic independent internal investigations of the department shall be conducted to ensure the implementation of state correctional policies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7921; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 416, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 47-5-2.
Corrections Investigative Taskforce created.

There is hereby created the Corrections Investigative Taskforce which shall consist of the following members: the Attorney General; State Auditor; the Chief Executive Officer of the Bureau of Narcotics, or his designee; the Chief Executive Officer of the Department of Public Safety, or his designee; the Chairman of the Senate Corrections Committee and the Chairman of the House Penitentiary Committee.

The taskforce shall:

Conduct or cause to be conducted periodic investigation of the Department of Corrections;

Study and make recommendations on correctional policies, including, but not limited to:

Drug trafficking;

Inmate gang activity;

Internal accounting and control procedures; and

Correction services and programs.

Request assistance from the Department of Audit, Office of the Attorney General, Department of Public Safety, Bureau of Narcotics and any other state agency. Any state agency shall comply with a request for assistance to the fullest extent possible.

The taskforce shall submit its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature no later than January 15 of each year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 416, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 47-5-3.
Facilities of the correctional system; their purposes and locations.

The plantation known as Parchman owned by the state in Sunflower and Quitman Counties, and in such other places as are now or may be hereafter owned or operated by the state for correctional purposes shall constitute the facilities of the correctional system for the custody, punishment, confinement at hard labor and reformation of all persons convicted of felony in the courts of the state and sentenced to the custody of the department, and whenever the term “penitentiary” or “state penitentiary” appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, it shall mean any facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections which is used for the purposes described herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7922; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 2 1976, ch. 440, § 19; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 397; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-4.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Adult” shall mean a person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older, or any person convicted of any crime not subject to the provisions of the Youth Court Law, or any person “certified” to be tried as an adult by any youth court in the state.

“Juvenile,” “minor” or “youthful” shall mean a person less than eighteen (18) years of age.

“Offender” shall mean any person convicted of a crime or offense under the laws and ordinances of the state and its political subdivisions.

“Facility or institution” shall mean any facility for the custody, care, treatment and study of offenders which is under the supervision and control of the Department of Corrections, including but not limited to the State Penitentiary property located in Sunflower and Quitman Counties.

“Detention” shall mean the temporary care of juveniles and adults who require secure custody for their own or the community’s protection in a physically restricting facility prior to adjudication, or retention in a physically restricting facility upon being taken into custody after an alleged parole or probation violation.

“Unit of local government” shall mean a county, city, town, village, or other general purpose political subdivision of the state.

“Department” shall mean the Mississippi Department of Corrections.

“Commissioner” shall mean the Commissioner of Corrections.

“Correctional system” shall mean the facilities, institutions, programs and personnel of the Department of Corrections utilized for adult offenders who are committed to the custody of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-5.
Limited centralization of facilities.

The commissioner, as soon as possible after passage of this section, shall prepare a plan to bring about the limited centralization of facilities within the state correctional system grounds at Parchman, Mississippi. The commissioner is authorized and empowered to use any state funds appropriated for such purposes, together with any available federal funds appropriated by the United States Congress for improvement of correctional institutions to construct modern security facilities for housing of offenders to the end that the state correctional system achieves the greatest degree of security for said offenders. Provided, however, that no new facility to house offenders shall be constructed within two-fifths (Cr) of a mile of any other offender camp. The commissioner shall bring about centralization of food facilities, recreational activities, utility services and other related facilities and correctional services that are presently decentralized within the correctional system.

It is the intent of the Mississippi Legislature that the commissioner shall fully utilize existing knowledge, architectural plans and expertise currently available with the Federal Bureau of Prisons and the Law Enforcement Assistance Administration to the end that the State of Mississippi shall have an efficient, modern, and properly secure state correctional system.

The commissioner is authorized to receive and disburse private and public grants, gifts and bequests which may be available to this state for correctional facilities, offender rehabilitation purposes and related purposes, which said sum so received shall be subject to all of the laws applicable to the State Fiscal Management Board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7926.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 11; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 20; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-6.
Oversight Task Force established; composition; powers and duties.

There is hereby established a committee to be known as the Corrections and Criminal Justice Oversight Task Force, hereinafter called the Oversight Task Force, which must exercise the powers and fulfill the duties described in this chapter.

The Oversight Task Force shall be composed of the following members:

The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint two (2) members;

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint two (2) members;

The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections, or his designee;

The Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court shall appoint one (1) member of the circuit court;

The Governor shall appoint one (1) member from the Parole Board;

The Director of the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review, or his designee;

The Attorney General shall appoint one (1) member representing the victims’ community;

The Mississippi Association of Supervisors shall appoint one (1) person to represent the association;

The President of the Mississippi Prosecutors’ Association;

The President of the Mississippi Sheriffs’ Association, or his designee; and

The Office of the State Public Defender shall appoint one (1) person to represent the public defender’s office.

The task force shall meet on or before July 15, 2015, at the call of the Commissioner of the Department of Corrections and organize itself by electing one (1) of its members as chair and such other officers as the task force may consider necessary. Thereafter, the task force shall meet at least biannually and at the call of the chair or by a majority of the members. A quorum consists of seven (7) members.

The task force shall have the following powers and duties:

Track and assess outcomes from the recommendations in the Corrections and Criminal Justice Task Force report of December 2013;

Prepare and submit an annual report no later than the first day of the second full week of each regular session of the Legislature on the outcome and performance measures to the Legislature, Governor and Chief Justice. The report shall include recommendations for improvements, recommendations on transfers of funding based on the success or failure of implementation of the recommendations, and a summary of savings. The report may also present additional recommendations to the Legislature on future legislation and policy options to enhance public safety and control corrections costs;

Monitor compliance with sentencing standards, assess their impact on the correctional resources of the state and determine if the standards advance the adopted sentencing policy goals of the state;

Review the classifications of crimes and sentences and make recommendations for change when supported by information that change is advisable to further the adopted sentencing policy goals of the state;

Develop a research and analysis system to determine the feasibility, impact on resources, and budget consequences of any proposed or existing legislation affecting sentence length;

Request, review, and receive data and reports on performance outcome measures as related to Chapter 457, Laws of 2014;

To undertake such additional studies or evaluations as the Oversight Task Force considers necessary to provide sentencing reform information and analysis;

Prepare and conduct annual continuing legal education seminars regarding the sentencing guidelines to be presented to judges, prosecuting attorneys and their deputies, and public defenders and their deputies, as so required;

The Oversight Task Force shall use clerical and professional employees of the Department of Corrections for its staff;

The Oversight Task Force may employ or retain other professional staff, upon the determination of the necessity for other staff;

The Oversight Task Force may employ consultants to assist in the evaluations and, when necessary, the implementation of the recommendations of the Corrections and Criminal Justice Task Force report of December 2013;

The Oversight Task Force is encouraged to apply for and may expend grants, gifts, or federal funds it receives from other sources to carry out its duties and responsibilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 68, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-7.
Seal.

The department shall procure a United States lock-seal, to be styled “Mississippi Department of Corrections” of which the commissioner shall be the custodian. Such seal shall be used to authenticate all the written official acts, orders and process executed and issued from the department, and especially on all orders dispatched to the county jails for offenders who have been sentenced to the custody of the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7973; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 53; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 21; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-8.
Department of Corrections; creation; divisions; succession to interests of State Penitentiary and State Probation and Parole Board.

There is created the Mississippi Department of Corrections, which shall be under the policy direction of the Governor. The chief administrative officer of the department shall be the Commissioner of Corrections.

There shall be a Division of Administration and Finance within the department, which shall have as its chief administrative officer a Deputy Commissioner for Administration and Finance who shall be appointed by the commissioner, and shall be directly responsible to the commissioner.

There shall be a Division of Community Corrections within the department, which shall have as its chief administrative officer a Deputy Commissioner for Community Corrections, who shall be appointed by the commissioner, and shall be directly responsible to the commissioner. The Probation and Parole Board shall continue to exercise the authority as provided by law, but after July 1, 1976, the Division of Community Corrections shall serve as the administrative agency for the Probation and Parole Board.

The department shall succeed to the exclusive control of all records, books, papers, equipment and supplies, and all lands, buildings and other real and personal property now or hereafter belonging to or assigned to the use and benefit or under the control of the Mississippi State Penitentiary and the Mississippi Probation and Parole Board, except the records of parole process and revocation and legal matters related thereto, and shall have the exercise and control of the use, distribution and disbursement of all funds, appropriations and taxes now or hereafter in possession, levied, collected or received or appropriated for the use, benefit, support and maintenance of these two (2) agencies except as otherwise provided by law, and the department shall have general supervision of all the affairs of the two (2) agencies herein named except as otherwise provided by law, and the care and conduct of all buildings and grounds, business methods and arrangements of accounts and records, the organization of the administrative plans of each institution, and all other matters incident to the proper functioning of the two (2) agencies.

The commissioner may lease the lands for oil, gas, mineral exploration and other purposes, and contract with other state agencies for the proper management of lands under such leases or for the provision of other services, and the proceeds thereof shall be paid into the General Fund of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, §§ 10, 11; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 216; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 6; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 624, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 47-5-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 60]

§ 47-5-10.
Department of Corrections; general powers and duties.

The department shall have the following powers and duties:

To accept adult offenders committed to it by the courts of this state for incarceration, care, custody, treatment and rehabilitation;

To provide for the care, custody, study, training, supervision and treatment of adult offenders committed to the department;

To maintain, administer and exercise executive and administrative supervision over all state correctional institutions and facilities used for the custody, training, care, treatment and after-care supervision of adult offenders committed to the department; provided, however, that such supervision shall not extend to any institution or facility for which executive and administrative supervision has been provided by law through another agency;

To plan, develop and coordinate a statewide, comprehensive correctional program designed to train and rehabilitate offenders in order to prevent, control and retard recidivism;

To maintain records of persons committed to it, and to establish programs of research, statistics and planning:

An offender’s records shall include a single cover sheet that contains the following information about the offender: name, including any aliases; department inmate number; social security number; photograph; court of conviction; cause number; date of conviction; date of sentence; total number of days in the department’s custody or number of days creditable toward time served on each charge; date of actual custody; and date of any revocation of a suspended sentence;

The department shall maintain an offender’s cover sheet in the course of its regularly conducted business activities and shall include an offender’s cover sheet in each request from a court, prosecutor or law enforcement agency for a summary of an offender’s records with the department, also known as a “pen-pack.” The cover sheet shall conform to Rules 803(6) and 803(8) of the Mississippi Rules of Evidence for admission as an exception to the hearsay rule and may be admissible when properly authenticated according to evidentiary rules and when offered for the purpose of enhanced sentencing under Section 41-29-147, 99-19-81 or 99-19-83 or other similar purposes; and

This subsection is not intended to conflict with an offender’s right of confrontation in criminal proceedings under the state or federal constitution;

To investigate the grievances of any person committed to the department, and to inquire into any alleged misconduct by employees; and for this purpose it may issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of writings and papers, and may examine under oath any witnesses who may appear before it;

To administer programs of training and development of personnel of the department;

To develop and implement diversified programs and facilities to promote, enhance, provide and assure the opportunities for the successful custody, training and treatment of adult offenders properly committed to the department or confined in any facility under its control. Such programs and facilities may include, but not be limited to, institutions, group homes, halfway houses, diagnostic centers, work and educational release centers, technical violation centers, restitution centers, counseling and supervision of probation, parole, suspension and compact cases, presentence investigating and other state and local community-based programs and facilities;

To receive, hold and use, as a corporate body, any real, personal and mixed property donated to the department, and any other corporate authority as shall be necessary for the operation of any facility at present or hereafter;

To provide those personnel, facilities, programs and services the department shall find necessary in the operation of a modern correctional system for the custody, care, study and treatment of adult offenders placed under its jurisdiction by the courts and other agencies in accordance with law;

To develop the capacity and administrative network necessary to deliver advisory consultation and technical assistance to units of local government for the purpose of assisting them in developing model local correctional programs for adult offenders;

To cooperate with other departments and agencies and with local communities for the development of standards and programs for better correctional services in this state;

To administer all monies and properties of the department;

To report annually to the Legislature and the Governor on the committed persons, institutions and programs of the department;

To cooperate with the courts and with public and private agencies and officials to assist in attaining the purposes of this chapter and Chapter 7 of this title. The department may enter into agreements and contracts with other departments of federal, state or local government and with private agencies concerning the discharge of its responsibilities or theirs. The department shall have the authority to accept and expend or use gifts, grants and subsidies from public and private sources;

To make all rules and regulations and exercise all powers and duties vested by law in the department;

The department may require a search of all persons entering the grounds and facilities at the correctional system;

To submit, in a timely manner, to the Oversight Task Force established in Section 47-5-6 any reports required by law or regulation or requested by the task force.

To discharge any other power or duty imposed or established by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 12; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 7; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 217; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 7; Laws, 2012, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-11.
Department to collect certain prison, probation and post-release supervision data; report to Oversight Task Force.

The Mississippi Department of Corrections shall collect the following information:

Prison data shall include:

1. Recidivism rates by offense type;

2. Recidivism rates by risk level;

The number of offenders entering prison on a new offense;

The number of offenders entering prison as a revocation of supervision;

The average sentence length for new prison sentences by offense type;

The average sentence length for offenders entering prison for a probation revocation;

The average sentence length for offenders entering prison for a parole revocation;

The average percentage of prison sentence served in prison by offense type;

The average length of stay by offense type;

Recidivism rates. For the purposes of this report, “recidivism” means conviction of a new felony offense within three (3) years of release from prison;

Total prison population;

1. By offense type;

2. By type of admission into prison.

Probation data shall include:

The number of offenders supervised on probation;

The number of offenders placed on probation;

The number of probationers revoked for a technical violation and sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a technical violation center;

The number of probationers revoked for a technical violation and sentenced to a term of imprisonment in another type of department of correction;

The number of probationers who are convicted of a new felony offense and sentenced to a term of imprisonment;

The number of probationers held on a violation in a county jail awaiting a revocation hearing; and

The average length of stay in a county jail for probationers awaiting a revocation hearing.

Post-release supervision data shall include:

The number of offenders supervised on post-release supervision;

The number of offenders placed on post-release supervision;

The number of post-release probationers revoked for a technical violation and sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a technical violation center;

The number of post-release probationers revoked for a technical violation and sentenced to a term of imprisonment in another type of department of correction facility;

The number of post-release probationers who are convicted of a new felony offense and sentenced to a term of imprisonment;

The number of post-release probationers held on a violation in a county jail awaiting a revocation hearing; and

The average length of stay in a county jail for post-release probationers awaiting a revocation hearing.

The Department of Corrections shall semiannually report information required in subsection (1) of this section to the Oversight Task Force, and upon request, shall report the information to the PEER Committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 66, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-12.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1988, ch. 504, § 60, eff from and after May 6, 1988.

[Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 8; Am Laws, 1983, ch. 351; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 8; Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 8]

§ 47-5-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 5; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 401]

§ 47-5-14.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1988, ch. 504, § 60, eff from and after May 6, 1988.

[Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 20; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 9; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 9]

§ 47-5-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 6]

§ 47-5-16.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1988, ch. 504, § 60, eff from and after May 6, 1988.

[Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 10; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 10; Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 10]

§ 47-5-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 7]

§§ 47-5-18 and 47-5-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1988, ch. 504, § 60, eff from and after May 6, 1988.

§47-5-18. [Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 11; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 11; Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 11]

§47-5-19. [Codes, 1942, § 7951; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 31; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 8; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 12; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 12; Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 12]

§ 47-5-20.
Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner shall have the following powers and duties:

To establish the general policy of the department;

To approve proposals for the location of new facilities, for major renovation activities, and for the creation of new programs and divisions within the department as well as for the abolition of the same; provided, however, that the commissioner shall approve the location of no new facility unless the board of supervisors of the county or the governing authorities of the municipality in which the new facility is to be located shall have had the opportunity with at least sixty (60) days’ prior notice to disapprove the location of the proposed facility. If either the board of supervisors or the governing authorities shall disapprove the facility, it shall not be located in that county or municipality. Said notice shall be made by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the members of the board or governing authorities and to the clerk thereof;

Except as otherwise provided or required by law, to open bids and approve the sale of any products or manufactured goods by the department according to applicable provisions of law regarding bidding and sale of state property, and according to rules and regulations established by the State Fiscal Management Board; and

To adopt administrative rules and regulations including, but not limited to, offender transfer procedures, award of administrative earned time, personnel procedures, employment practices.

To make personnel actions for a period of one (1) year beginning July 1, 2016, that are exempt from State Personnel Board rules, regulations and procedures in order to give the commissioner flexibility in making an orderly, effective and timely reorganization and realignment of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 9; Laws, 1977, ch. 479, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 13; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 13; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 218; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 13; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 6; Laws, 2016, ch. 495, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 47-5-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1988, ch. 504, § 60, eff from and after May 6, 1988.

[Codes, 1942, § 7928; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 8; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 14; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 14; Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 14]

§ 47-5-23.
Management and control of correctional system to be vested in Department of Corrections.

The department shall be vested with the exclusive responsibility for management and control of the correctional system, and all properties belonging thereto, subject only to the limitations of this chapter, and shall be responsible for the management of affairs of the correctional system and for the proper care, treatment, feeding, clothing and management of the offenders confined therein. The commissioner shall have final authority to employ and discharge all employees of the correctional system, except as otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7930; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 10; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 22; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 15; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 15; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-24.
Commissioner of Corrections; appointment; compensation; qualifications; bond.

The Governor shall appoint a Commissioner of Corrections, with the advice and consent of the Senate. Such commissioner may be removed by the Governor. The commissioner shall be the chief executive, administrative and fiscal officer of the department.

The commissioner shall receive an annual salary fixed by the Governor, not to exceed the maximum authorized by law, in addition to all actual, necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of official duties, including mileage as authorized by law.

The commissioner shall possess the following minimum qualifications:

A master’s degree in corrections, criminal justice, guidance, social work, or some related field, and at least six (6) years full-time experience in corrections, including at least three (3) years of correctional management experience; or

A bachelor’s degree in a field described in subparagraph (a) of this subsection and at least ten (10) years full-time work in corrections, five (5) years of which shall have been in correctional management; or

Shall possess at least a bachelor’s degree and relevant experience in fiscal management in the private or public sector.

The commissioner shall be required, upon assuming the duties of his office, to execute a good and sufficient bond payable to the State of Mississippi in the sum of Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), conditioned upon an accurate accounting for all monies and property coming into his hands. The commissioner, upon approval by the Governor, may require of other officers, employees and agents of the department a good and sufficient bond in such sum as he may determine, subject to the minimum requirements set forth herein, payable to the State of Mississippi upon like condition. The bonds shall be approved by the Governor and filed with the Secretary of State, and shall be executed by a surety company authorized to do business under the laws of this state. The premium on any such bond shall be paid by the state out of the support and maintenance fund of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 13; Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 11; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 16; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 16; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 16; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 12; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 29; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 3; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 9]

§ 47-5-26.
Commissioner of Corrections; employment of deputy commissioners, administrative assistant for parole matters, and prison superintendents.

The commissioner shall employ the following personnel:

A Deputy Commissioner for Administration and Finance, who shall supervise and implement all fiscal policies and programs within the department, supervise and implement all hiring and personnel matters within the department, supervise the department’s personnel director, supervise and implement all purchasing within the department and supervise and implement all data processing activities within the department, and who shall serve as the Chief Executive Officer of the Division of Administration and Finance. He shall possess either:

A master’s degree from an accredited four-year college or university in public or business administration, accounting, economics or a directly related field, and four (4) years of experience in work related to the above-described duties, one (1) year of which must have included line or functional supervision; or

A bachelor’s degree from an accredited four-year college or university in public or business administration, accounting, economics or a directly related field, and six (6) years of experience in work related to the above-described duties, one (1) year of which must have included line or functional supervision. Certification by the State of Mississippi as a certified public accountant may be substituted for one (1) year of the required experience.

A Deputy Commissioner for Community Corrections, who shall initiate and administer programs, including, but not limited to, supervision of probationers, parolees and suspensioners, counseling, community-based treatment, interstate compact administration and enforcement, prevention programs, halfway houses and group homes, technical violation centers, restitution centers, presentence investigations, and work and educational releases, and shall serve as the Chief Executive Officer of the Division of Community Services. The Deputy Commissioner for Community Corrections is charged with full and complete cooperation with the State Parole Board and shall make monthly reports to the Chairman of the Parole Board in the form and type required by the chairman, in his discretion, for the proper performance of the probation and parole functions. After a plea or verdict of guilty to a felony is entered against a person and before he is sentenced, the Deputy Commissioner for Community Corrections shall procure from any available source and shall file in the presentence records any information regarding any criminal history of the person such as fingerprints, dates of arrests, complaints, civil and criminal charges, investigative reports of arresting and prosecuting agencies, reports of the National Crime Information Center, the nature and character of each offense, noting all particular circumstances thereof and any similar data about the person. The Deputy Commissioner for Community Corrections shall keep an accurate and complete duplicate record of this file and shall furnish the duplicate to the department. This file shall be placed in and shall constitute a part of the inmate’s master file. The Deputy Commissioner for Community Corrections shall furnish this file to the State Parole Board when the file is needed in the course of its official duties. He shall possess either: (i) a master’s degree in counseling, corrections psychology, guidance, social work, criminal justice or some related field and at least four (4) years’ full-time experience in such field, including at least one (1) year of supervisory experience; or (ii) a bachelor’s degree in a field described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and at least six (6) years’ full-time work in corrections, one (1) year of which shall have been at the supervisory level.

A Deputy Commissioner for Institutions, who shall administer institutions, reception and diagnostic centers, prerelease centers and other facilities and programs provided therein, and shall serve as the Chief Executive Officer of the Division of Institutions. He shall possess either: (i) a master’s degree in counseling, criminal justice, psychology, guidance, social work, business or some related field, and at least four (4) years’ full-time experience in corrections, including at least one (1) year of correctional management experience; or (ii) a bachelor’s degree in a field described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and at least six (6) years’ full-time work in corrections, four (4) years of which shall have been at the correctional management level.

The commissioner shall employ an administrative assistant for parole matters, who shall be an employee of the department assigned to the State Parole Board and who shall work under the guidance and supervision of the board.

The administrative assistant for parole matters shall receive an annual salary to be established by the Legislature. The salaries of department employees not established by the Legislature shall receive an annual salary established by the State Personnel Board.

The commissioner shall employ a superintendent for the Parchman facility, Central Mississippi Correctional Facility and South Mississippi Correctional Institution of the Department of Corrections. The Superintendent of the Mississippi State Penitentiary shall reside on the grounds of the Parchman facility. Each superintendent shall appoint an officer in charge when he is absent.

Each superintendent shall develop and implement a plan for the prevention and control of an inmate riot and shall file a report with the Chairman of the Senate Corrections Committee and the Chairman of the House Penitentiary Committee on the first day of each regular session of the Legislature regarding the status of the plan.

In order that the grievances and complaints of inmates, employees and visitors at each facility may be heard in a timely and orderly manner, each superintendent shall appoint or designate an employee at the facility to hear grievances and complaints and to report grievances and complaints to the superintendent. Each superintendent shall institute procedures as are necessary to provide confidentiality to those who file grievances and complaints.

For a one-year period beginning July 1, 2016, any person authorized for employment under this section shall not be subject to the rules, regulations and procedures of the State Personnel Board, except as otherwise provided under Section 25-9-127(5).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 14; Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 12; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 17; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 17; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 17; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 8; Laws, 1989, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 3, § 9; Laws, 1992, ch. 368 § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 577, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch 419, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 624, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 63; Laws, 2016, ch. 495, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 47-5-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 6; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 4; Laws, 1975, ch. 403]